Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2034.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 12MUSHROOM FARMINGSec.1201. Definitions.1202. Best management practices.1203. Mitigation plans.1204. General inspections.1205. Mushroom Farming and Composting Fund.§ 1201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fund." The Mushroom Farming and Composting Fund established under section 1205 (relating to Mushroom Farming and Composting Fund)."Mushroom composting operation." Any farm or business that produces compost from the spent mushroom substrate used to grow mushrooms."Mushroom farm." A normal agricultural operation where the main crop being produced, grown, harvested, transported or exported are mushrooms."Normal agricultural operation." As defined under section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), entitled "An act protecting agricultural operations from nuisance suits and ordinances under certain circumstances.""Operation." Either a mushroom composting operation or a normal agricultural operation.§ 1202. Best management practices.(a) Duties of the department.--The department shall, in collaboration with the Department of Environmental Protection, develop best management practices for mushroom farms and mushroom composting operations. These practices shall include, but are not limited to, measures providing for the mitigation of:(1) mushroom phorid flies on the farm or composting operation; and(2) hydrogen sulfide produced by mushroom farms or mushroom composting operations.(b) Notification.--Within 90 days following the effective date of this subsection, the department shall promulgate the 20250HB2034PN2591 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 best management practices and post them on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The department shall notify operations required to develop a mitigation plan under section 1203 (relating to mitigation plans) by first class mail to each operation's registered mailing address.§ 1203. Mitigation plans.(a) Requirement.--All existing and new mushroom farms and mushroom composting operations shall develop and implement mitigation plans that utilize the best management practices for the mitigation of:(1) phorid flies on the farm or composting operation; and(2) hydrogen sulfide.(b) Review and approval.--The plan implemented under subsection (a), or any plan amendment, shall be submitted to the department for review and approval. Within 90 days of receipt of a mitigation plan or plan amendment, the department shall approve or disapprove the plan or plan amendment. The following shall apply:(1) Approvals shall only be granted for those plans or plan amendments that satisfy the requirements of the regulations promulgated under this chapter.(2) Notice of determination to approve or disapprove a plan or plan amendment shall be provided in writing to the person submitting the plan or plan amendment.(3) Notice of a determination to disapprove shall include an explanation specifically stating the reasons for disapproval.(4) If a plan or plan amendment is disapproved, the person submitting the plan or plan amendment shall have 60 20250HB2034PN2591 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days after receipt of notice of disapproval to resubmit a revised plan or plan amendment.(5) An existing or new mushroom farm or mushroom composting operation that submits a complete plan or plan amendment is authorized to implement the plan or plan amendment if the department fails to act within 90 days of submittal.(c) Implementation.--A person required to have a mitigation plan under this section shall fully implement the plan prior to commencing use of the new mushroom farm or mushroom composting operation.(d) Transferability of plans.--A plan approved under this section shall be transferable to a subsequent owner of a mushroom farm or mushroom composting operation upon notification of the transfer to the department unless the transfer results in operational changes requiring plan modification pursuant to the criteria established in this section.(e) Fines.--If a farm or composting operation required to have a mitigation plan under this section fails to submit a plan or implement an approved plan within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.(f) Effectiveness of section.--The requirements of this section shall become mandatory 90 days following the effective date of the best management practices promulgated under section 1202 (relating to best management practices).§ 1204. General inspections.(a) Inspections.--To ensure that the operators of a mushroom farm or mushroom composting operation are following established best management practices and are implementing a mitigation plan 20250HB2034PN2591 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved under section 1203 (relating to mitigation plans), the department shall perform an unannounced inspection of each operator's facilities once every 18 months following the approval of the mitigation plan. If a facility is not in compliance with the mitigation plan, operators shall have 60 days to make any corrections that the department determines to be necessary.(b) Fines.--Following the 60-day period under subsection (a), the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for any mushroom farm or mushroom composting operation that the department determines is out of compliance with the approved mitigation plan.§ 1205. Mushroom Farming and Composting Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Mushroom Farming and Composting Fund is established as a restricted revenue account in the State Treasury. Money collected by the department under this chapter or appropriated, given, granted or donated for the purpose established under this chapter by the Commonwealth or any other government or private agency or person shall be deposited into the fund.(b) Appropriation.--(1) Money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to be used for the purposes of this chapter.(2) All interest and earnings received from investments or deposits of the money in the fund shall be paid into the fund for the purpose authorized by this section. Unexpended money and interest or earnings on the money in the fund may not be transferred or revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund to be used by the department for the 20250HB2034PN2591 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purpose specified under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2034PN2591 - 6 - 12